Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3852
(UTC 507) Personal obligations of trustee.

(UTC 507) Trust property is not subject to personal obligations of the trustee, even if the trustee becomes insolvent or bankrupt.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 52.